District of Columbia statutes.
47-2415

Regulations.

The Mayor may issue regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 136, ch. 146, title VI, § 616
Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-71, § 2, 28 DCR 5243
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
This section is referenced in § 47-2422.
1981 Ed., § 47-2415.